Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.064

Suspended sentence—Termination date, establishment—Modification of terms.

In the case of a person granted a suspended sentence under the provisions of RCW 9.92.060, the court shall establish a definite termination date for the suspended sentence. The court shall set a date no later than the time the original sentence would have elapsed and may provide for an earlier termination of the suspended sentence. Prior to the entry of an order formally terminating a suspended sentence the court may modify the terms and conditions of the suspension or extend the period of the suspended sentence.

[ 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 188 s 2.]

NOTES:

Applicability—1984 c 209: See RCW 9.92.900.

Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 47: See note following RCW 9.41.190.